Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-529
Personal service
upon appointed resident agent; appointment; recording and indexing; fees.

The register of deeds of each county shall record such appointment
as shall be filed under the provisions of section 25-528 and any revocation
thereof in the Miscellaneous Record, shall enter such instruments in the numerical
index against the lands described therein, and shall be entitled to demand
and receive fees as provided in section 33-109.

Laws 1877, § 2, p. 18;

R.S.1913, § 7650;

C.S.1922, § 8594;

Laws 1927, c. 65, § 2, p. 228;

C.S.1929, § 20-529;

R.S.1943, § 25-529;

Laws 1984, LB 679, § 11;

Laws 2012, LB14, § 1.